Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2484.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: ARTICLE 1 APPROPRIATIONS Section 1. new text begin CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT APPROPRIATIONS.new text end new text begin (a) The sums shown in the column under "Appropriations" are appropriated from the general fund in fiscal year 2027 to the state agencies or officials indicated, to be spent for public purposes. These are onetime appropriations. Unless otherwise specified, money appropriated in this act is subject to paragraphs (b) to (e) of this section. new text end new text begin (b) For any project funded in whole or in part by this act, workers on the project must be paid at least the prevailing wage rate as defined in Minnesota Statutes, section 177.42, subdivision 6, and the project is subject to the requirements and enforcement provisions in Minnesota Statutes, sections 177.27, 177.30, 177.32, and 177.41 to 177.45. For the purposes of this paragraph, "project" means demolition, erection, construction, remodeling, or repairing of a public building, facility, or other public work financed in whole or part by state funds. Project also includes demolition, erection, construction, remodeling, or repairing of a building, facility, or public work when the acquisition of property, predesign, design, or demolition is financed in whole or in part by state funds. new text end new text begin (c) Money appropriated in this act: (1) is available for a grant after the commissioner of management and budget determines that an amount sufficient to complete the project as described in this act has been committed to the project, as required by Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.502; (2) may be used to pay state agency staff costs that are attributed directly to the capital program or project for capitalizable staff costs; and (3) is available until the project is completed or abandoned, subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642. new text end new text begin (d) The sustainable building guidelines under Minnesota Statutes, section 16B.325, are mandatory for all new buildings and major renovations owned or to be owned by the state, state agencies, Minnesota State Colleges and Universities, and the University of Minnesota that are funded with an appropriation in this act. new text end new text begin (e) Recipients of grants from money appropriated in this act must demonstrate to the commissioner of the agency making the grant that the recipient has the ability and a plan to fund the program intended for the facility. This paragraph does not apply to state agencies. new text end new text begin APPROPRIATIONS new text end Sec. 2. new text begin MINNESOTA STATE COLLEGES AND UNIVERSITIESnew text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Total Appropriation new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 4,500,000 new text end new text begin To the Board of Trustees of the Minnesota State Colleges and Universities for the purposes specified in this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Systemwide Demolition new text end new text begin 3,000,000 new text end new text begin For demolition and removal of obsolete and underutilized buildings and infrastructure and restoration of the vacant sites to reduce operations, maintenance, and capital renewal costs on Minnesota State Colleges and Universities campuses. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Winona State University new text end new text begin 1,500,000 new text end new text begin To establish physical space and programming on the Winona State University campus dedicated to a legislative engagement center. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin EDUCATIONnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 808,000 new text end new text begin To the commissioner of education for a grant to the Lower Sioux Indian Community in Redwood County for predesign and design of a Dakota language immersion public charter school for birth through grade 4. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin NATURAL RESOURCESnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 400,000 new text end new text begin To the commissioner of natural resources for a grant to the Pickwick Mill Inc., for improvements and repairs to the historic Pickwick Mill Dam in Winona County. new text end Sec. 5. new text begin POLLUTION CONTROL AGENCYnew text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Total Appropriation new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 775,000 new text end new text begin To the Pollution Control Agency for the purposes specified in this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Statewide Drinking Water Contamination Mitigation new text end new text begin 650,000 new text end new text begin For projects or grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 115B.245. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Infectious Waste Study new text end new text begin 125,000 new text end new text begin To conduct a study of unlawful shipment of infectious or pathological waste as provided in article 2. This appropriation is not an appropriation for a capital improvement project within the meaning of Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642, notwithstanding the requirements in section 1, paragraphs (b) to (e). This appropriation is available until June 30, 2031. new text end Sec. 6. new text begin PUBLIC SAFETYnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 400,000 new text end new text begin To the commissioner of public safety for a grant to the city of Medford to acquire property for and to predesign and design a fire station. new text end Sec. 7. new text begin TRANSPORTATIONnew text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Total Appropriation new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 4,550,000 new text end new text begin To the commissioner of transportation for the purposes specified in this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin 70th Street Interchange new text end new text begin 400,000 new text end new text begin For preliminary design and final design of an interchange at marked Trunk Highway 10/Trunk Highway 61 and Washington County State-Aid Highway 22 (70th Street) in the city of St. Paul Park. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Hortman Memorial Highway Signage new text end new text begin 750,000 new text end new text begin To mark Trunk Highway 610 and erect appropriate signs in accordance with Minnesota Statutes, section 161.14, subdivision 112. This appropriation is not an appropriation for a capital improvement project within the meaning of Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642, notwithstanding the requirements in section 1, paragraphs (b) to (e). This appropriation is available until June 30, 2031. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Ramsey; North Metro Local Road Planning Activities new text end new text begin 2,900,000 new text end new text begin (a) For a grant to the city of Ramsey for the activities stated in paragraph (b) to prepare for a new river crossing and future improvements to road, transportation, and other infrastructure in the area bounded by and inclusive of marked Trunk Highway 101, U.S. Highway 10, U.S. Highway 169, marked Trunk Highway 610, and marked Interstate Highway 94. new text end new text begin (b) This appropriation includes money for the following activities: new text end new text begin (1) planning and evaluation, environmental analysis, and design necessary for the river crossing and future road, transportation, and other infrastructure improvements in the project area; new text end new text begin (2) completion of Tier I and environmental impact statements required for the project area; and new text end new text begin (3) assessment of the impact of improvements to highways and roads in the project area on other local infrastructure systems, including but not limited to water, wastewater, and stormwater systems. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Radar Infrastructure Grants new text end new text begin 500,000 new text end new text begin For radar infrastructure grants as provided in article 2. new text end Sec. 8. new text begin HUMAN SERVICESnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 550,000 new text end new text begin To the commissioner of human services for administration of emergency shelter facility grants. This appropriation is not an appropriation for a capital improvement project within the meaning of Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642, notwithstanding the requirements in section 1, paragraphs (b) to (e). This appropriation is available until June 30, 2031. new text end Sec. 9. new text begin HEALTHnew text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Total Appropriation new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 2,300,000 new text end new text begin To the commissioner of health for the purposes specified in this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Drinking Water Planning Grants new text end new text begin 1,800,000 new text end new text begin For drinking water regionalization planning and assistance grants as provided in article 2. This appropriation is not an appropriation for a capital improvement project within the meaning of Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642, notwithstanding the requirements in section 1, paragraphs (b) to (e). This appropriation is available until June 30, 2031. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin West Central Dental Resources new text end new text begin 500,000 new text end new text begin For a grant to West Central Dental Resources, Inc., to furnish and equip a critical access dental clinic in the city of Alexandria. new text end Sec. 10. new text begin CORRECTIONSnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 2,302,000 new text end new text begin For asset preservation improvement and betterments of a capital nature at Minnesota correctional facilities statewide to be spent in accordance with Minnesota Statutes, section 16B.307. Notwithstanding the specified uses of money under Minnesota Statutes, section 16B.307, the commissioner may use the general fund appropriation for capital expenditures allowed under Minnesota Statutes, section 16B.307, that do not constitute betterments and capital improvements within the meaning of the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, section 5, clause (a). The report required under Minnesota Statutes, section 16B.307, subdivision 2, shall include a list of all projects that have been paid for with this appropriation. new text end Sec. 11. new text begin EMPLOYMENT AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENTnew text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Total Appropriation new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 18,980,000 new text end new text begin To the commissioner of employment and economic development for the purposes specified in this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Anoka; Haven for Heroes new text end new text begin 500,000 new text end new text begin For a grant to the city of Anoka to renovate and repair Cottage 3 and the auditorium on the Haven for Heroes campus. This appropriation includes money for improvements of a capital nature, including major projects to preserve or replace mechanical, electrical, plumbing, and security systems; safety and energy efficiency upgrades; roof repairs; and site renovations to support ongoing operations. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin South St. Paul; Public Works Facility new text end new text begin 2,250,000 new text end new text begin For a grant to the city of South St. Paul for environmental remediation activities and geotechnical soil corrections at the new Public Works Central Maintenance Facility site at 675 Verderosa Avenue in the city of South St. Paul. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin City of Ottertail; Veterans Memorial new text end new text begin 100,000 new text end new text begin For a grant to the city of Ottertail to design, construct, and equip site improvements and infrastructure for a veterans memorial in the city of Ottertail. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin St. Paul; Arena at the RiverCentre Complex new text end new text begin 10,000,000 new text end new text begin For a grant to the city of St. Paul for predesign and design of updates and improvements to the arena at the RiverCentre complex. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Capitol Area Economic Development Grant Program new text end new text begin 630,000 new text end new text begin For a grant to the St. Paul Port Authority for the Capitol Area economic development grant program, established in Laws 2025, First Special Session chapter 14, section 3, subdivision 3. This appropriation is added to and is for the same purpose as the appropriation in Laws 2025, First Special Session chapter 14, section 3, subdivision 3. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin St. Paul Port Authority; The Heights Redevelopment Site new text end new text begin 1,000,000 new text end new text begin For a grant to the city of St. Paul for the design and construction of a city park at the former Hillcrest Golf Course, now known as The Heights. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Gammelgarden Museum new text end new text begin 200,000 new text end new text begin For a grant to the Gammelgarden Museum of Scandia in the city of Scandia to preserve and restore historically significant buildings on the grounds of the museum. new text end new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Bridge for Youth new text end new text begin 1,000,000 new text end new text begin For a grant to The Bridge for Youth for predesign, design, and land acquisition for a new multiuse facility in Hennepin County. The new facility shall include youth program and recreational space, administrative and program office space, and up to 40 new units of transitional and affordable housing and emergency shelter space for unaccompanied homeless youth and young families experiencing homelessness. new text end new text begin Subd. 10. new text end new text begin Center for Communication and Development new text end new text begin 1,000,000 new text end new text begin For a grant to the Center for Communication and Development to construct, furnish, and equip a new Center for Communication and Development facility in the city of Minneapolis. This appropriation is in addition to the appropriation in Laws 2025, First Special Session chapter 14, section 5. new text end new text begin Subd. 11. new text end new text begin Neighborhood HealthSource new text end new text begin 1,300,000 new text end new text begin For a grant to Neighborhood HealthSource to predesign, design, construct, furnish, and equip a new clinic in North Minneapolis to relocate the clinic currently located on Fremont Avenue in the city of Minneapolis. The new clinic must be designed with affordable housing located above the clinic that will be owned and managed by a different organization. new text end new text begin Subd. 12. new text end new text begin New Pathways new text end new text begin 250,000 new text end new text begin For a grant to New Pathways, Inc., to design, construct, furnish, and equip a regional shelter facility to provide comprehensive support services for families with children experiencing homelessness in the city of Cambridge and the surrounding area. new text end new text begin Subd. 13. new text end new text begin Organization of Liberians in Minnesota new text end new text begin 400,000 new text end new text begin For a grant to the Organization of Liberians in Minnesota (OLM) for the renovation, construction, furnishing, and equipping of the organization's current community center in Brooklyn Park to provide culturally appropriate programs and services to meet the diverse needs of community members in the northwest suburbs. new text end new text begin Subd. 14. new text end new text begin Stillwater Veterans Memorial new text end new text begin 350,000 new text end new text begin For a grant to Stillwater Veterans Memorial to expand a veterans' memorial in Stillwater Veterans Memorial Park in the city of Stillwater. new text end Sec. 12. new text begin PUBLIC FACILITIES AUTHORITYnew text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Total Appropriation new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 10,600,000 new text end new text begin To the Public Facilities Authority for the purposes specified in this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Apple Valley; Water Treatment Plant Improvements new text end new text begin 6,100,000 new text end new text begin For a grant to the city of Apple Valley to predesign and design the renovation and expansion of the existing water treatment plant in the city to address perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances (PFAS) in the city's drinking water supply. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin North St. Paul; Water Tower new text end new text begin 4,500,000 new text end new text begin For a grant to the city of North St. Paul to design, construct, and equip a new water tower. new text end Sec. 13. new text begin MINNESOTA HISTORICAL SOCIETYnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 300,000 new text end new text begin To the Minnesota Historical Society for a grant to Dakota County to design and construct wayfinding and interpretive signage for the Heroes and Heritage Interpretive Trail Loop in Dakota County. new text end ARTICLE 2 MISCELLANEOUS Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 161.14, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 112. new text end new text begin Hortman Memorial Highway. new text end new text begin Marked Trunk Highway 610 is designated as "Hortman Memorial Highway." Subject to section 161.139, the commissioner must adopt a suitable design to mark this highway and erect appropriate signs. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 474A.02, subdivision 1a, is amended to read: Subd. 1a. Aggregate bond limitation. "Aggregate bond limitation" means deleted text begin up to 55 percent of the reasonably expected aggregate basis of a residential rental project and the land on which the project is or will be located.deleted text end new text begin the greater of:new text end new text begin (1) 30 percent of the reasonably expected aggregate basis of a residential rental project and the land on which the project is or will be located; or new text end new text begin (2) the maximum supportable permanent amortizing debt, subject to a maximum of 40 percent of the reasonably expected aggregate basis of a residential rental project and the land on which the project is or will be located. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin DRINKING WATER REGIONALIZATION PLANNING AND ASSISTANCE GRANTS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Eligible recipients. new text end new text begin Grants under this section must be made available to counties, municipalities, and townships that seek to undertake the process outlined in chapter 116A to establish or expand regional drinking water systems. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Eligible expenses. new text end new text begin Grant funds must be used for planning activities, including feasibility studies, engineering analyses, legal and financial assessments, community engagement efforts, preliminary and final design work, and activities necessary for drinking water system establishment or expansion under chapter 116A to support regional drinking water infrastructure development. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Grant administration. new text end new text begin By November 1, 2026, the commissioner of health must develop an application process and selection criteria that prioritizes projects addressing aging infrastructure, water quality, affordability, or economic development. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Grant maximum and match requirement. new text end new text begin Grants awarded under this section must not exceed $300,000 per grant recipient per year. Grant recipients must provide matching funds equaling at least 25 percent of the total grant amount. For any one regional drinking water system or district, the commissioner may not award grants in a fiscal year that, in the aggregate across all grant recipients involved with that drinking water system or district, exceed 60 percent of the funds available for that fiscal year. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Reporting. new text end new text begin The commissioner of health must submit a report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over water infrastructure by January 15, 2028, summarizing the grants awarded, the progress of funded projects, and recommendations for future funding to support drinking water regionalization efforts. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin STUDY OF UNLAWFUL SHIPMENT OF INFECTIOUS OR PATHOLOGICAL WASTE.new text end new text begin By January 15, 2027, the commissioner of the Pollution Control Agency must submit a study to the chairs and ranking minority members of the senate and house of representatives committees and divisions with primary jurisdiction over environment and health and human services on the unlawful transportation of infectious or pathological waste to solid waste management facilities. The study must include: new text end new text begin (1) an assessment of the extent and frequency of unlawful transfer of infectious or pathological waste to solid waste management facilities and an assessment of the costs associated with those unlawful transfers; new text end new text begin (2) a survey of a representative sample of known generators of infectious waste regarding current practices for ensuring infectious and pathological waste is segregated from other waste material as required by Minnesota Statutes, section 116.78; and new text end new text begin (3) recommendations for legislative or policy changes that could be adopted to reduce the frequency and cost of unlawful transfers of infectious or pathological waste, including an estimate of the costs to state agencies. In formulating these recommendations, the commissioner must consider whether the following measures might contribute to a reduction in unlawful transfers of infectious or pathological waste to solid waste management facilities: new text end new text begin (i) imposing fines on generators of infectious or pathological waste who arrange for its transportation to solid waste management facilities that have not been approved by the agency to accept infectious or pathological waste; and new text end new text begin (ii) undertaking unannounced inspections of infectious or pathological waste generators. new text end Sec. 5. new text begin APPLICABILITY OF INCREASED FUNDING FOR WATER INFRASTRUCTURE GRANTS.new text end new text begin The maximum grant amount for water infrastructure grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 446A.072, subdivision 5a, as set forth in Laws 2025, First Special Session chapter 15, article 2, section 5, is available to drinking water projects that received points for consolidation on the Drinking Water Revolving Fund Project Priority List subject to a grant agreement under Minnesota Statutes, section 446A.072, subdivision 5a, as of September 1, 2024, or thereafter. new text end Sec. 6. new text begin RADAR INFRASTRUCTURE GRANTS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Purpose. new text end new text begin The commissioner of transportation, in consultation with the commissioner of public safety, shall make grants to political subdivisions of the state, including airport authorities and airport commissions, for the acquisition, design, construction, and installation of mobile radar infrastructure and equipment to enhance airspace and marine surveillance. Projects supported by this appropriation shall provide statewide surveillance of low altitude airspace and navigable waterways, detect and track intruding aircraft and vessels, assist with drone traffic management and emergency response, and enhance collision and obstruction avoidance for publicly owned airports and public waters. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Grants. new text end new text begin (a) Grants under this section may be used for the following projects: new text end new text begin (1) procurement and installation of radar sensors capable of detecting and tracking small, low radar cross section targets to track aircraft, unmanned aerial vehicles, and vessels across Minnesota's airspace and waterways; new text end new text begin (2) construction of radar towers; acquisition or leasing of temporary or mobile towers, shelters, and power infrastructure; installation of communications networks such as fiber optic lines or secure wireless links to allow real time remote display, alerting, and control; new text end new text begin (3) integration with existing surveillance and air traffic systems, including automatic identification system (AIS) and automatic dependent surveillance-broadcast (ADS-B) data, and installation of ancillary equipment, including cameras, forward looking infrared devices, and other sensors for consolidated situational awareness; and new text end new text begin (4) site acquisition and improvement for radar installations, including grading, foundations, and access roads. new text end new text begin (b) Money from a grant may also be used for training and technical support necessary to commission and operate the capital project. new text end Sec. 7. new text begin MELISSA HORTMAN MEMORIAL.new text end new text begin (a) $800,000 of the appropriation to implement the updated Capitol Mall Design Framework under Laws 2023, chapter 62, article 1, section 11, subdivision 2, as amended by Laws 2025, chapter 39, article 1, section 39, is to design, procure, and install a tribute recognizing Melissa Hortman. The tribute shall be incorporated into the design of a memorial garden on the State Office Building site by the Department of Administration. Minnesota Rules, part 2400.2703, shall not apply to the activities funded under this section. new text end new text begin (b) Notwithstanding any law or rule to the contrary, the Capitol Area Architectural and Planning Board must select the artist to create the tribute via a competitive process and obtain the approval of the immediate family of Melissa Hortman throughout the selection and design approval process. The tribute design shall include the likeness of Melissa Hortman and deceased family members of Melissa Hortman. new text end Sec. 8. new text begin TRANSFER.new text end new text begin Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 116L.20, subdivision 2, paragraph (a), $3,800,000 in fiscal year 2026 is transferred from the workforce development fund to the general fund. This is a onetime transfer. new text end Sec. 9. new text begin APPROPRIATION; ZOOLOGICAL BOARD.new text end new text begin $3,800,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated to the Minnesota Zoological Board to address an operational deficiency. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end Sec. 10. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS; STATE AIRPORTS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Mankato Regional Airport. new text end new text begin $1,265,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the state airports fund to the commissioner of transportation for a grant to the city of Mankato to design, construct, furnish, and equip an air traffic control tower facility at the Mankato Regional Airport. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2028. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Duluth International Airport. new text end new text begin (a) $2,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the state airports fund to the commissioner of transportation for a grant to the Duluth Airport Authority to design, construct, furnish, and equip a new air traffic control tower and base building to include office spaces, office support spaces, equipment rooms, work spaces, and logistic support spaces at the Duluth International Airport. This project includes site and associated site support area preparation, including demolition of obsolete buildings, construction and installation of utilities and a stormwater retention system, and existing fuel tank replacement. A portion of this appropriation must be used as a match to federal funding for the project. new text end new text begin (b) Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16B.98, subdivision 14, the commissioner must not use any amount of this appropriation for administrative costs. This appropriation is in addition to the appropriation under Laws 2025, First Special Session chapter 8, article 1, section 2, subdivision 2, paragraph (a), clause (1). This appropriation is available until June 30, 2028. new text end new text begin (c) The base for this appropriation is $2,000,000 in fiscal year 2028 and $0 in fiscal year 2029 and thereafter. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 11. new text begin CANCELLATIONS.new text end new text begin (a) The appropriation of $4,500,000 in Laws 2023, chapter 71, article 1, section 14, subdivision 30, is canceled. new text end new text begin (b) The appropriation of $7,000,000 in Laws 2023, chapter 71, article 1, section 11, subdivision 2, is canceled. new text end new text begin (c) $5,700,000 of the appropriation in Laws 2021, First Special Session chapter 14, article 11, section 42, as amended by Laws 2023, chapter 73, section 2, is canceled. new text end new text begin (d) $565,000 of the appropriation in Laws 2021, First Special Session chapter 14, article 11, section 41, is canceled. new text end Sec. 12. new text begin CORRIDORS OF COMMERCE; EXTENSION.new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, "relevant appropriations" means the appropriations and bond sale authorizations in: new text end new text begin (1) Laws 2021, First Special Session chapter 5, article 2, section 2, subdivision 1; and new text end new text begin (2) Laws 2023, chapter 68, article 2, section 2, subdivision 1. new text end new text begin (b) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, those portions of the relevant appropriations and bond sale authorizations that the commissioner of transportation has awarded under the corridors of commerce program to a project that provides for reconstruction of marked Trunk Highway 13 in the cities of Savage and Burnsville are available until June 30, 2029. new text end Sec. 13. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE.new text end new text begin This article is effective the day following final enactment. new text end ARTICLE 3 APPROPRIATION MODIFICATIONS Section 1. Laws 2023, chapter 37, article 1, section 2, subdivision 15, is amended to read: Subd. 15. Capacity-Building Grants 3,145,000 3,145,000 (a) This appropriation is for capacity-building grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 462A.21, subdivision 3b. Of this amount, up to $170,000 in fiscal year 2024 is for Open Access Connections. The appropriation for Open Access Connections is onetime. (b) $445,000 in fiscal year 2024 is for a grant to deleted text begin the Community Stabilization Projectdeleted text end new text begin Merrick Community Servicesnew text end to: (1) deliver services and curriculum to renters and property owners in order to preserve deeply affordable rental units in underrepresented communities; (2) help create entry-level employment opportunities for renters; and (3) construct a secure space for documents and identification for those experiencing homelessness. This is a onetime appropriation. (c) The base for this program in fiscal year 2026 and beyond is $645,000. Sec. 2. Laws 2023, chapter 71, article 1, section 10, subdivision 9, is amended to read: Subd. 9. Hennepin County; Railroad Crossing 450,000 For one or more grants to Hennepin County, the city of Medina, the city of Independence, or a combination thereof, to design, engineer, and construct railroad crossing safety improvements at Town Line Road in the city of Medina and the city of Independence.new text begin Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642, this appropriation is available until December 31, 2029.new text end Sec. 3. Laws 2023, chapter 71, article 1, section 10, subdivision 10, is amended to read: Subd. 10. Hutchinson; Civil Air Patrol 3,700,000 For a grant to the city of Hutchinson to predesign, design, new text begin construct, new text end equip, and furnish a hangar and statewide training center for the Civil Air Patrol. Sec. 4. Laws 2023, chapter 71, article 1, section 11, subdivision 7, as amended by Laws 2025, First Special Session chapter 15, article 3, section 5, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Dellwood; Lake Links Trail 2,000,000 new text begin (a) new text end For one or more grants to the city of Dellwood in Washington County to design, engineer, construct, and equip trail improvements consistent with the completed preliminary engineering along or parallel with the shore of White Bear Lake between the Mahtomedi city limits and deleted text begin the western border of Washington Countydeleted text end new text begin Meadow Lane in the city of Dellwoodnew text end . This appropriation may also be used for the acquisition of permanent easements and right-of-way. This appropriation is in addition to the appropriation in Laws 2020, Fifth Special Session chapter 3, article 1, section 17, subdivision 13, new text begin as amended by Laws 2023, chapter 72, article 3, section 23, and Laws 2025, First Special Session chapter 15, article 3, section 2, and is new text end for the same purposes. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642, the appropriation for this project is available until December 31, 2028. new text begin (b) The city of Dellwood may complete the trail improvements funded under paragraph (a) in the following segments and in any order, and may enter into separate grant agreements for each trail segment or any combination of segments: new text end new text begin (1) Echo Street to Dwinnell Avenue; new text end new text begin (2) Yellow Birch Road to Echo Street; and new text end new text begin (3) Meadow Lane to Yellow Birch Road. new text end new text begin Amounts remaining after substantial completion of a trail segment or combination of segments under this paragraph may be applied to any other trail segment or combination of segments described in this paragraph. new text end Sec. 5. Laws 2023, chapter 71, article 1, section 11, subdivision 9, is amended to read: Subd. 9. Dakota County; Thompson Park 2,000,000 For a grant to Dakota County for design of Thompson County Park Master Plan improvementsdeleted text begin , which may include a land bridge over Highway 52, a pollinator promenade, a sensory garden, restoration of historical stream corridor, farmstead interpretation, Dakota Lodge renovations, a sound wall, a greenway rest area with picnic shelter, and a sledding hilldeleted text end new text begin and construction of Dakota Lodge improvements, park entry wayfinding and safety improvements, and an accessible trail loop with inclusive nature play stationsnew text end . Sec. 6. Laws 2023, chapter 71, article 1, section 11, subdivision 15, as amended by Laws 2024, chapter 88, article 1, section 8, is amended to read: Subd. 15. Ramsey County; Rice Street Revitalization 1,000,000 For one or more grants to Ramsey County, the city of Maplewood, the city of St. Paul, or the city of Roseville for the Rice Street revitalization project, to improve safety for users in the corridor with a focus on pedestrians and bicyclists. This appropriation includes money for predesign, design, environmental analysis, and right-of-way acquisition of Rice Street (County State-Aid Highway 49) and on approach streets to support reconstruction of Rice Street from Wheelock Parkway in St. Paul to County Road B in Roseville and Maplewood. new text begin Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642, the appropriation for this project is available until December 31, 2029.new text end Sec. 7. Laws 2023, chapter 71, article 1, section 14, subdivision 25, is amended to read: Subd. 25. Mendota Heights; Pilot Knob 1,850,000 For a grant to the city of Mendota Heights for development of Oheyawahe (Pilot Knob), a culturally, historically, and environmentally important site and Dakota sacred site located at 2100 Pilot Knob Road in Mendota Heights, overlooking the confluence of the Mississippi and Minnesota Rivers, which is included on the National Register of Historic Places. This appropriation includes money to design and construct: multipurpose gathering spaces, interpretation structures, trail connections and walkways, parking, and other visitor amenities and infrastructure; grading, landscaping, and other site and natural resource improvements including the planting and restoration of native vegetation; and other betterments necessary to provide safe and improved visitor access and preserve the site as a public natural area.new text begin Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642, the appropriation for this project is available until December 31, 2029.new text end Sec. 8. Laws 2023, chapter 71, article 1, section 14, subdivision 35, is amended to read: Subd. 35. St. Paul; Inclusive Playground 2,500,000 For a grant to the city of St. Paul to construct, furnish, and equip an inclusive and accessible playground in the city of St. Paul. "Inclusive and accessible playground" as used in this subdivision means a playground, planned and designed in partnership with community stakeholders, designed to be safe and accessible to all children, including those with intellectual, developmental, or physical disabilities.new text begin Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642, the appropriation for this project is available until December 31, 2029.new text end Sec. 9. Laws 2023, chapter 71, article 1, section 14, subdivision 43, is amended to read: Subd. 43. Accessible Space 1,150,000 For deleted text begin a grant to Accessible Space, Inc.,deleted text end new text begin grantsnew text end for capital improvements deleted text begin ofdeleted text end new text begin tonew text end low-income accessible housing units deleted text begin located at 814 Iglehart Avenue, 825 Selby Avenue, and 135 to 154 Western Avenue South in the city of St. Paul; 1370 Curve Crest Boulevard in the city of Stillwater; and 1074 Roselawn Avenue West in the city of Rosevilledeleted text end .new text begin Of this appropriation, $183,000 is for a grant to ASI Homes, Inc., to construct capital improvements of low-income accessible housing units located at 814 Iglehart Avenue and 825 Selby Avenue in the city of St. Paul; $250,000 is for a grant to ASI Stillwater, Inc., to construct capital improvements of low-income accessible housing units located at 1370 Curve Crest Boulevard in the city of Stillwater; $417,000 is for a grant to ASI Roseville, Inc., to construct capital improvements of low-income accessible housing units located at 1074 Roselawn Avenue West in the city of Roseville; and $300,000 is for a grant to Twin Ports Accessibility Project, Inc., to construct capital improvements of low-income accessible housing units located at 135 to 154 Western Avenue South in the city of St. Paul.new text end Sec. 10. Laws 2023, chapter 71, article 1, section 14, subdivision 46, is amended to read: Subd. 46. Agate Housing and Services 5,000,000 new text begin (a) new text end For a grant to Agate Housing and Services to design, construct, equip, and furnish a shelter facility in the city of Minneapolis for those experiencing homelessness. new text begin (b) Any money remaining after the project in paragraph (a) is completed may be used to predesign, design, furnish, equip, renovate, and construct a second shelter facility to be located in the city of Minneapolis. new text end Sec. 11. Laws 2023, chapter 71, article 1, section 14, subdivision 47, is amended to read: Subd. 47. Ain Dah Yung Center 2,200,000 For a grant to the Ain Dah Yung (Our Home) Center to new text begin predesign, design, new text end construct, furnish, and equip the renovation of the emergency shelter deleted text begin and youth lodgedeleted text end in the city of St. Paul. The renovations include tuckpointing, electric upgrades, ADA access, emergency fire escape, and bathroom renovation for the emergency shelter. deleted text begin This appropriation also includes money for roof replacement, electric upgrades, and ADA access for the youth lodge.deleted text end Sec. 12. Laws 2023, chapter 71, article 1, section 14, subdivision 50, is amended to read: Subd. 50. Appetite For Change 1,500,000 For a grant to Appetite for Change to acquire property, predesign, and design a facility that will provide access to food, workforce development, urban agriculture, and health and wellness services in the city of Minneapolis.new text begin Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642, the appropriation for this project is available until December 31, 2029.new text end Sec. 13. Laws 2023, chapter 71, article 1, section 14, subdivision 54, is amended to read: Subd. 54. CornerHouse 2,750,000 For a grant to CornerHouse to acquire property for a new facility in Hennepin County.new text begin Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642, the appropriation for this project is available until December 31, 2029.new text end Sec. 14. Laws 2023, chapter 71, article 1, section 14, subdivision 56, is amended to read: Subd. 56. Division of Indian Work 500,000 For a grant to the Division of Indian Work (DIW) to deleted text begin predesign the renovation ofdeleted text end new text begin demolishnew text end property it currently owns, which formerly served as a transitional housing facility for teen mothers, deleted text begin and the renovation anddeleted text end new text begin to renovate and makenew text end capital repairs deleted text begin ofdeleted text end new text begin tonew text end the DIW's existing facility at 1001 East Lake Street in the city of Minneapolisnew text begin , and to predesign an expansion of the facility at 1001 East Lake Streetnew text end , to better carry out its mission of providing support and strength to urban American Indian people through a full spectrum of culturally based programming. Sec. 15. Laws 2023, chapter 71, article 1, section 14, subdivision 66, as amended by Laws 2024, chapter 88, article 1, section 22, is amended to read: Subd. 66. Irreducible Grace Foundation 1,500,000 For a grant to the Irreducible Grace Foundation to acquire and to design, construct, furnish, and equip the renovation of existing multiunit residential housing in the Rondo or Frogtown neighborhood in the city of St. Paul to be owned and managed by the Irreducible Grace Foundation to provide approximately 12 to 14 units of housing for youth and young adults facing homelessness.new text begin Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642, the appropriation for this project is available until December 31, 2029.new text end Sec. 16. Laws 2023, chapter 71, article 1, section 14, subdivision 75, is amended to read: Subd. 75. MNI Sota Fund 1,000,000 For a grant to MNI Sota Fund to acquire real property for and to design a new facility in the city of Minneapolis. MNI Sota Fund will create an Indigenous asset building center equipped with classrooms, office space, and a small business incubator to support aspiring American Indian entrepreneurs and homeowners.new text begin Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642, the appropriation for this project is available until December 31, 2029.new text end Sec. 17. Laws 2023, chapter 71, article 1, section 14, subdivision 91, is amended to read: Subd. 91. Sanneh Foundation 1,820,000 For a grant to the Sanneh Foundation to acquire property for deleted text begin and to predesign and designdeleted text end an Innovation Center in the city of St. Paul for community gathering, training, and for supportive housing to host teacher pathway candidates and future educators, nonprofit service providers, AmeriCorps members, new text begin workforce and human development participants and programs, new text end and other community employees serving the public. Sec. 18. Laws 2023, chapter 71, article 1, section 15, subdivision 9, is amended to read: Subd. 9. Lincoln-Pipestone Rural Water System 11,500,000 new text begin (a) new text end For one or more grants to the Lincoln-Pipestone Rural Water System for the purposes described in this subdivision. (1) $4,000,000 of this appropriation is to design, construct, and equip deleted text begin a biological filtrationdeleted text end new text begin water source improvementsnew text end and water treatment deleted text begin systemdeleted text end new text begin improvementsnew text end for new text begin the reduction of new text end nitrate deleted text begin removaldeleted text end new text begin and other contaminantsnew text end . (2) $2,500,000 of this appropriation is to design and construct improvements and betterments of a capital nature to water treatment facilities in Fortier Township, including contact basin and water storage improvements. (3) $5,000,000 of this appropriation is to acquire property and to design and construct water storage and distribution infrastructure, including booster stations and new water connecting pipelines. new text begin (b) Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642, this appropriation is available until December 31, 2028. new text end Sec. 19. Laws 2023, chapter 72, article 2, section 3, subdivision 14, is amended to read: Subd. 14. Sauk River Watershed District; deleted text begin Gravitydeleted text end Outlet Conveyance System 1,400,000 For a grant to the Sauk River Watershed District to design, construct, and equip deleted text begin a gravitydeleted text end new text begin annew text end outlet conveyance system, including an upstream control structure at the outlet location, to direct water from Long Lake in Birchdale Township in Todd County to deleted text begin Sauk Lakedeleted text end new text begin an appropriate downstream outletnew text end in Todd County to mitigate issues caused by high water levels in Long Lake. Sec. 20. Laws 2023, chapter 72, article 2, section 9, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Forest Lake; Veterans Memorial 250,000 For a grant to the new text begin city of new text end Forest Lake deleted text begin Veterans Memorial Committeedeleted text end to construct a memorial to veterans of the United States armed forces at Lakeside Memorial Park. Sec. 21. Laws 2023, chapter 72, article 2, section 9, subdivision 12, is amended to read: Subd. 12. Winona; Mississippi deleted text begin Riverdeleted text end new text begin Riverfront new text end Trail 5,000,000 For a grant to the city of Winona for final design, engineering, and construction of a deleted text begin bridge and bridge approaches connecting to Chestnut Street at one end and Carimona Street at the other end as part of the multipurpose nonmotorized Riverfront Trail from Levee Park to Lions Parkdeleted text end new text begin trail segment to connect portions of the Mississippi Riverfront Trail between Levee Park and Lions Park. Any unspent portion of this appropriation remaining after completion of the project listed in this subdivision, after written notice to the commissioner of management and budget, is available for final design, engineering, and construction to extend the Mississippi Riverfront Trail in the city of Winonanew text end . Sec. 22. Laws 2023, chapter 72, article 2, section 10, subdivision 10, is amended to read: Subd. 10. North Zumbro Sanitary District; Wastewater Treatment Facility 10,000,000 For a grant to the joint powers sanitary district created pursuant to Minnesota Statutes, section 471.59, comprising the cities of Zumbrota, Goodhue, Pine Island, and Wanamingo, to acquire property for and to deleted text begin predesigndeleted text end new text begin design and engineernew text end a new state-of-the-art regional wastewater treatment facility to be located in Goodhue County and to serve as a regional wastewater facility prototype. This facility shall provide wastewater treatment service for the Elk Run settlement lands of the Prairie Island Indian Community, which shall connect to existing wastewater infrastructure in the city of Pine Island. This appropriation includes money for improvements and betterments of a capital nature, including thenew text begin demolition of the existing wastewater treatment structures and related infrastructure, andnew text end construction of infrastructure necessary to connect the new facility to the communities in the sanitary district and for the facility to serve its intended purpose. Sec. 23. Laws 2023, chapter 72, article 2, section 11, is amended to read: Sec. 11. MINNESOTA HISTORICAL SOCIETY $ 2,100,000 To the Minnesota Historical Society for a grant to Dodge County to predesign, design, and construct the stabilization of the Wasioja Historic District seminary ruinsdeleted text begin ;deleted text end new text begin andnew text end to predesign, design, and construct a walkway to the middle of the ruins to preserve and enhance access to the ruinsdeleted text begin ; and to construct a fence surrounding the ruinsdeleted text end . Sec. 24. Laws 2024, chapter 125, article 8, section 6, is amended to read: Sec. 6. deleted text begin DEPARTMENT OF EMPLOYMENT AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENTdeleted text end new text begin METROPOLITAN COUNCILnew text end $ -0- $ 5,000,000 Cedar Riverside Recreation Center. $5,000,000 in fiscal year 2025 is for a deleted text begin paymentdeleted text end new text begin grantnew text end to the Minneapolis Park and Recreation Board for the design, development, and construction of the new Cedar Riverside Recreation Center to serve the largest immigrant population center in the state. This is a onetime appropriation available until June 30, 2028. Sec. 25. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE.new text end new text begin This article is effective the day following final enactment. new text end